Nebraska, session 109, LB1057.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-404 (1) Adult day service means a person or any legal entity which
provides care and an array of social, medical, or other support services for a
period of less than twenty-four consecutive hours in a community-based group
program to four or more persons who require or request such services due to age
or functional impairment.
(2) Adult day service does not include community-based waiver services
provided by an entity certified as a specialized program pursuant to under the
Developmental Disabilities Services Act or a PACE center.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-